California statutes. Education Code
(4) Provide opportunities for domestic and international students to interact effectively and routinely share their views, perceptions, and experiences in educational settings.

(5) Develop innovative public educational forums and venues to explore global issues and showcase world cultures.

(c) For international students and scholars, institutions are encouraged, as resources permit, to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Encourage the presence of qualified students from other countries with sufficient geographic diversity to inspire an appreciation for differences among cultures and a deeper understanding of the values and perspectives of other people.

(2) Facilitate faculty exchange and collaborative partnership programs with institutions in other countries.

(3) Initiate collaborative research undertakings to address issues of global significance.

(4) Recruit and retain the world’s best and brightest faculty to educate California’s students as globally competent citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 458, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

66015.10.

(a) The University of California is requested to annually notify the governing board of each high school of both of the following:

(1) The number of graduates who enrolled in the university in the previous year and the number of graduates who were required to take the entry level writing requirement.

(2) The comparable numbers of all California high school graduates who enrolled in the university.

(b) The University
 of California is requested to provide an annual summary of the information specified in subdivision (a) to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 3.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

66015.12.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University (CSU) assess and report the general education written communication and mathematics and quantitative reasoning placement levels of all first-time freshmen. On or before April 1 of each year, the CSU shall submit to the Legislature a report by each campus in the system that includes all of the following information:

(1) The total number of regularly admitted and specially admitted first-time freshmen.

(2) The number and proportion of regularly admitted and specially admitted first-time freshmen who fall into each of the university’s four levels of placement for general education written communication and mathematics and
 quantitative reasoning. For purposes of this paragraph, the university shall disaggregate this number into the following two general education categories:

(A) Written communication.

(B) Mathematics and quantitative reasoning.

(3) The number and proportion of regularly admitted and specially admitted first-time freshmen in each level who meet the general education requirement for each category identified in paragraph (2) as follows:

(A) Before the fall term of the academic year.

(B) At the end of the fall term of the academic year.

(C) At the end of the spring term of the academic year.

(D) At the end of the fall term of the second academic year.

(4) (A) An analysis of the university’s three factors that go into the multiple measures assessment of placement of freshmen into a specified level, and how predictive each of those factors is for student success indicators.

(B) For purposes of this section:

(i) The university’s three factors that go into the multiple measures assessment of the placement of freshmen are: (I) course taking, (II) grade point average, and (III) test taking.

(ii) “Student success indicators” are all of the following: (I) persistence into the fall term of the second academic year at the CSU, (II) the number of units completed at the
 CSU in the first academic year, and (III) grade point average at the CSU in the first academic year.

(5) An analysis of any equity gaps by income, race, or ethnicity within and across the university’s four levels of placement for general education written communication and mathematics and quantitative reasoning, and the university’s plan to address any such gaps.

(b) The report required by this section shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 564, Sec. 1.   (AB 914)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

66016.

It is the intent of the Legislature that opportunities for participation in intercollegiate athletic programs in the community colleges, in the campuses of the California State University, and in the campuses of the University of California be provided on as equal a basis as is practicable to male and female students.

The costs of providing these equal opportunities may vary according to the type of sports contained within the respective men’s and women’s athletic programs. Therefore it is also the intent of the Legislature that additional sources of revenue should be determined to provide additional funds for these equal opportunity programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

66016.3.

(a) (1) Any student, including a person without lawful immigration status, or a person who is exempt from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5, may serve in any capacity in student government at the California State University or the California Community Colleges and receive any grant, scholarship, fee waiver, or reimbursement for expenses incurred connected with that service to the full extent consistent with federal law.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 1020 of the Government Code, any student attending a campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, or an independent institution of
 higher education, as defined in Section 66010, who qualifies for exemption from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 may serve on any board or commission established pursuant to this title that includes members who are students.

(b) The University of California is requested to comply with this section.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares this section is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 182, Sec. 2.   (AB 1887)   Effective August 24, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

66016.4.

If a state court finds that Section 66016.3, or any similar provision adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is unlawful, the court may order, as equitable relief, that the administering entity that is the subject of the lawsuit terminate any waiver awarded under that statute or provision, but no money damages, tuition refund or waiver, or other retroactive relief may be awarded. In any action in which the court finds that Section 66016.3, or any similar provision adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is unlawful, the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California are immune from the imposition of any award of money damages, tuition refund or waiver, or other retroactive relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 619, Sec. 2.   (AB 844)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66017.

The respective governing boards of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California shall adopt appropriate procedures and designate appropriate persons to take disciplinary action against any student, member of the faculty, member of the support staff, or member of the administration of the community college, state college, or state university who, after a prompt hearing by a campus body, has been found to have willfully disrupted the orderly operation of the campus. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, where an immediate suspension is required in order to protect lives or property and to ensure the maintenance of order, interim suspension pending a hearing; provided that a reasonable opportunity be afforded the suspended person for a hearing within 10 days. The disciplinary action may include, but need not be limited to, suspension, dismissal, or expulsion. Sections 89538 to 89540, inclusive, shall be applicable to any state university or college employee dismissed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

66017.7.

(a) A public postsecondary educational institution or independent institution of higher education, or employee or student thereof, that confines dogs or cats for the purposes set forth in Section 1650 of the Health and Safety Code, if the institution assesses the health of an animal and determines, after the completion of any testing or research, that the animal is suitable for adoption, the animal’s destruction is not
 required, and the animal is no longer needed, and if the institution’s existing procedures for adopting the animal do not result in an adoption, shall offer the dogs or cats to an animal adoption organization or animal rescue organization for adoption prior to euthanizing those animals. A public postsecondary educational institution or independent institution of higher education that is required to offer dogs or cats to an animal adoption organization or animal rescue organization under this section may enter into an agreement with an animal adoption organization or animal rescue organization for the implementation of this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Animal adoption
 organization” or “animal rescue organization” means a not-for-profit entity that is exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code established for purposes of rescuing animals in need and finding permanent, adoptive homes for those animals and that maintain records pursuant to Section 32003 of the Food and Agriculture Code.

(2) “Independent institution of higher education” means a nonpublic educational institution as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(3) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges.

(c) This section does not apply to animals within the meaning of Section 17006 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 147)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

66018.

Each institution of public higher education shall require that all applications for any type of financial aid for students shall disclose all taxable income and all nontaxable income.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66018.4.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to stop the practice of legacy and donor admissions and protect students as they pursue their higher education.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Donor preference in admissions” means considering an applicant’s relation to a donor of, or a donation to, the independent institution of higher education as a factor in the admissions process, including asking an applicant to indicate their family’s donor status and including that information among the documents that the independent institution of higher education uses to consider an applicant for admission.

(2) “Independent institution of higher education” means a nonpublic higher education institution that grants undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, that is formed as a nonprofit corporation in this state, that is accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, and that receives, or benefits from, state-funded student financial assistance or that enrolls students who receive state-funded student financial assistance.

(3) (A) “Legacy preference in admissions” means considering an applicant’s relation to an alumni of the independent institution of higher education as a factor in the admissions process, including asking an applicant to indicate where their relatives attended college and including that information among the documents that the independent institution of higher education uses to consider an applicant for admission.

(B) “Legacy preference in admissions” does not include collecting data on an applicant’s relation to an alumni or donors for purposes other than admissions decisions.

(c) Commencing September 1, 2025, an independent institution of higher education shall not provide a legacy preference or donor preference in admissions to an applicant as part of the regular or early action admissions process.

(d) On or before June 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, an independent institution of higher education shall report to the Legislature and the Department of Justice, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, either of the following:

(1) The independent institution of higher education was in compliance with subdivision (c) for all enrolled students for that
 academic year.

(2) (A) The independent institution of higher education was in violation of subdivision (c) for that same academic year.

(B) (i) An independent institution of higher education that reports that it was in violation of subdivision (c), regardless of the number of violations, shall include in its report both of the following for that academic year:

(I) The legacy status, donor status, race, county of residence, income brackets, and athletic status of newly enrolled students at the independent institution of higher education.

(II) The admission rate of students who are provided a legacy preference or donor preference in admissions, as compared to the admission rate of students who are not provided a
 legacy preference or donor preference in admissions.

(ii) Data in the report submitted pursuant to clause (i) shall only be publicly provided in the aggregate and in a manner that prevents the identification of any individual.

(e) The Department of Justice shall post the names of the independent institutions of higher education that violate subdivision (c) on its internet website by the next fiscal year after receiving reports pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1006, Sec. 1.   (AB 1780)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66018.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The recent college admissions scandal highlights the need for fair and transparent admissions processes, and concern for what is referred to as “back door” admissions for legacy and donor-related applicants who collectively do not reflect the diversity of the state.

(2) Research has shown that legacy and donor admissions give an unfair advantage to wealthier students who benefit from having parents or other individuals in their lives who went to college.

(3) It is the intent of the
 Legislature to enact legislation to bring more fairness and transparency to college admissions in the state, especially at institutions of higher education that enroll students who receive state-funded financial aid. 

(b) On or before June 30, 2020, and on or before June 30 of each year from 2021 to 2024, inclusive, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the appropriate governing bodies of each independent institution of higher education that is a “qualifying institution,” as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, shall report to the appropriate
 budget subcommittees and policy committees of the Legislature whether
 their respective institutions provide any manner of preferential treatment in admission to applicants on the basis of their relationships to donors or alumni of the institution.

(c) Each institution that provides preferential treatment as described in subdivision (b) shall include in its report pursuant to subdivision (b) all of the following for the academic year commencing in the previous calendar year pertaining to applicants described in subdivision (b):

(1) The number of applicants who did not meet the institution’s admission standards that apply to all applicants, but who
 were offered admission.

(2) The number of applicants reported pursuant to paragraph (1) who accepted admission to the institution.

(3) The number of applicants reported pursuant to paragraph (2) who enrolled at the institution.

(4) The number of applicants who met the institution’s admission standards that apply to all applicants and who were offered admission.

(5) The number of applicants reported pursuant to paragraph (4) who accepted admission to the institution.

(6) The number of applicants reported pursuant to paragraph (5) who enrolled at the institution.

(d) Information reported by the California State University and the University of California pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be disaggregated by each campus of these segments.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 67400, this section shall apply to the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   (AB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66018.55.

(a) As used in this section, “college and university” includes all institutions of public higher education and all independent institutions of higher education.

(b) The Office of Privacy Protection in the Department of Consumer Affairs shall establish a task force to conduct a review of the use by all colleges and universities of social security numbers in order to recommend practices to minimize the collection, use, storage, and retention of social security numbers in relation to academic and operational needs and applicable legal requirements.

(c) The task force shall be known as the “College and University Social Security Number Task Force.” The Office of Privacy Protection shall determine the composition of the task force, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Two representatives from each of the three institutions of public higher education.

(2) Two representatives of the California Association of Independent Colleges and Universities.

(3) Two representatives each from two organizations devoted to the protection of personal privacy.

(4) One representative from a national organization devoted to the management of information technology in higher education.

(5) One representative from the business community with expertise in technological solutions to privacy concerns.

(6) One representative each from the Assembly Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Committee on Judiciary.

(d) The task force shall seek input, as deemed necessary and appropriate, from all of the following:

(1) Representatives of organizations with expertise in technical policy and practices of Internet disclosure, privacy policy relevant to Internet disclosure, and fostering public integrity and accountability.

(2) The constituencies of the college and university communities, including students, staff, and faculty.

(e) The task force shall review and make recommendations to minimize the collection, use, storage, and retention of social security numbers by California colleges and universities and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A survey of best practices at colleges and universities and the costs of implementing those best practices.

(2) The necessary use and protection of social security numbers for all of the following:

(A) Research purposes.

(B) Academic purposes, including, but not limited to, academic research, admission, financial aid, and other related operational uses.

(C) Operational uses by academic medical centers, including, but not limited to, patient identification, tracking, and care.

(D) Business purposes, including, but not limited to, the provision of employee benefits, tax purposes, loan programs, and other requirements imposed by current state and federal statutes and regulations.

(E) Another operational need of the college or university.

(3) Current personal privacy protections provided to students, applicants, staff, and faculty of colleges and universities.

(4) Existing state and federal legal requirements, including regulatory requirements, mandating the use of social security numbers at colleges and universities.

(5) The possible use of personal identifiers or other substitutes for social security numbers that protect personal information and meet the operational needs of colleges and universities.

(6) The cost of funding any recommendations presented by the task force, including those that are of minimal cost and can be implemented immediately and those that require additional funding or time to implement.

(f) The task force shall commence meetings no later than May 1, 2008.

(g) (1) On or before July 1, 2010, the task force shall submit a final report of its findings and recommendations to the Office of Privacy Protection, and to the Assembly Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Committee on Judiciary.

(2) The final report shall also include a list of the existing uses of social security numbers common among colleges and universities for routine operations and compliance with state and federal laws.

(3) The findings and recommendations of the task force shall be informational only and shall not be binding on any college or university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

66019.

(a) Each state university and college, when determining eligibility for any state university or college educational opportunity program, and each governing board of a community college district, when determining eligibility for any community college educational opportunity program, shall consider nontaxable income.

(b) The Regents of the University of California are requested to provide that nontaxable income be considered in all determinations of eligibility for any educational opportunity programs at the University of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66019.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California to disseminate information to foster care agencies regarding admissions requirements and financial aid.

(b) The Legislature requests the Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University to explore methods of using the admissions-by-exemption category to assist the transition of students who are homeless youth or foster youth into four-year public institutions of higher education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 571, Sec. 1.   (AB 1228)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

66020.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, work with their respective colleges and universities to confer an honorary degree upon each person, living or deceased, who was forced to leave his or her studies at the public postsecondary educational institution in which that person was enrolled as a result of the issuance of federal Executive Order 9066 on February 19, 1942, which caused the evacuation, relocation, and incarceration of individuals of Japanese ancestry during World War II.

(b) In cases where an honorary degree is conferred upon a person who is deceased, the person’s surviving next of kin, or
 another representative chosen by the person’s surviving next of kin, may accept the honorary degree on the deceased person’s behalf.

(c) Independent colleges and universities, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010, are urged to comply with the terms of this section.

(d) This section shall be implemented in a cost-effective manner by incorporating, to the extent practicable, any ceremony for the purpose of conferring honorary degrees with a previously scheduled commencement or graduation activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 213, Sec. 2.   (AB 37)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

66020.5.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Student Aid Commission, including any auxiliary organization established pursuant to Section 69522, shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, do all of the following:

(1) (A) Provide for live video and audio transmission of all meetings, which are open to the public pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3
 of Title 2 of the Government Code), through a technology that is accessible to as large a segment of the public as possible, including, but not necessarily limited to, the use of either of the following technologies:

(i) Cable, satellite, or any other type of transmission that can be accessed through a television.

(ii) Web cast, in which case notice of meetings that are open to the public and links to the Web cast shall be easily accessible via each entity’s Internet Web site.

(B) If the meeting described in subparagraph (A) is conducted from more than one location at the same time, through a teleconference or a similar technology, the live video transmission shall be provided from at least one of the
 locations and the live audio transmission shall be provided from all locations.

(2) Provide public notice before the meeting regarding which location or locations the live video transmission will be provided from pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Archive and post the video and audio transmissions recorded pursuant to paragraph (1) on the entity’s Internet Web site for at least 12 months and within 48 hours following the initial transmission.

(b) It is not a violation of this section if technical failures prevent an entity from providing a live video or audio transmission, or archiving or posting the video and audio transmission, so long as the entity exercised reasonable diligence in making a live video or audio transmission
 available and archiving and posting the video and audio transmission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.   (AB 1723)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

66020.8.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Adjustment for unusual circumstances” means an unusual circumstances adjustment, as described in 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087tt(c) and 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087vv(d)(9), regarding the dependency status of a financial aid applicant.

(2) “Applicant” means a financial aid applicant attending, or applying to attend, the California State University, California Community Colleges, or University of California.

(3) “Financial aid” means any form of student financial aid or institutional financial
 aid.

(4) “Financial aid administrator” means a financial aid administrator of the California State University, California Community Colleges, or University of California for purposes of determining institutional financial aid of the applicant, or the Student Aid Commission for purposes of determining student financial aid of the applicant, as applicable.

(5) “Institutional financial aid” means all institutional grant aid, including institutional student need-based and merit-based aid.

(6) “Local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.

(7) “Sworn attestation” means a statement signed under penalty of perjury
 by an authorized representative of a local educational agency, county child welfare department, or probation department. The attestation shall include all of the following:

(A) The name, organization, and title of the attester.

(B) A declaration that the attester has provided services, instruction, or assistance to the student.

(C) A declaration that the attester is familiar with the student’s relationship with their parent or parents, as defined in Section 668.2(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) A declaration that, to the best of the attester’s personal knowledge, the student is either unable to contact their parent or parents, or contacting
 their parent or parents would pose a risk to the student.

(b) For purposes of making an adjustment for unusual circumstances of an applicant, a financial aid administrator shall accept a sworn attestation as sufficient documentation for purposes of 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087tt(a)(3)(B).

(c) This section does not prohibit a financial aid administrator from accepting other types of adequate documentation to substantiate a student’s unusual circumstances in accordance with 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087tt(a)(3). 

(d) The Regents of the
 University of California are requested to adopt a policy to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (AB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Budget Act for each fiscal year provide sufficient funding for financial aid for students with demonstrated financial need at the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to offset increases in student charges at those institutions. The Legislature intends that funds for increased student financial aid be provided from sources other than student fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Institutional financial aid” means all institutional grant aid, including institutional student need-based and merit-based aid.

(2) “Students” means California residents who are undergraduate students at the University of California or the California State University.

(b) The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, report annually to the Legislature on their respective institutional financial aid programs. The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to,
 provide reports on or before March 31 of each year.

(c) The reports shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the goals, terms, and policies of each of the university’s institutional aid programs, including eligibility criteria, allocation of financial aid awards, fee waivers, and other relevant information.

(2) A description and explanation of any changes the university has made to any of these policies since the prior year, and any changes the university intends to make for the next academic year.

(3) The total amount the university expended on institutional aid for students, for the two prior academic years, the current year, and a projection for the next year, and the average and 90th percentile undergraduate institutional aid award
 amount provided per recipient for the prior two academic years and the current academic year.

(4) By parental income level or expected family contribution deciles, both of the following information for the prior academic year:

(A) Net price, which is the balance of the total cost of attendance minus all grant aid.

(B) The percentage of students receiving institutional aid and the average dollar amount of that institutional aid.

(5) For the prior academic year, the current academic year, and the budget year, an analysis identifying the estimated number of undergraduates with financial need; their aggregate cost of attendance and aggregate expected federal parent contribution; the aggregate amount of financial aid, including federal gift aid, state gift
 aid, institutional need-based aid, institutional merit-based aid, other institutional gift aid, and private gift aid, received by these students; the aggregate remaining amount to be met by work, borrowing, or other means; and an explanation of the estimated change in aggregate student need in the budget year resulting from changes in the cost of attendance, and other factors, including any fee increases proposed by the university in its fall budget proposal. The explanation shall include an estimate of the extent to which cost increases will be offset by federal, state, and institutional financial aid programs. The explanation shall also include an explanation of how year-to-year non-tuition cost increases were calculated.

(6) The typical financial aid package for a typical dependent undergraduate student with a parent income of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), forty thousand dollars ($40,000), sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), eighty
 thousand dollars ($80,000), and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(7) An aggregate summary of financial aid awarded to students, including scholarships, grants, waivers, loans, and workstudy awards from federal, state, institutional, and private sources for the prior academic year.

(8) Indicators of the effectiveness of the university’s aid programs in achieving the university’s stated goals related to financial aid.

(9) Information on students who submit a Free Application for Federal Student Aid, or Dream Act Application, but do not receive a Cal Grant or institutional financial aid for the prior academic year. This information shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, expected family contribution deciles, and dependency status.

(10) The
 California State University shall include information on the number of students who are eligible for a grant pursuant to the State University Grant Program but do not receive it or receive a partial award for the prior academic year. This information shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and campus of attendance.

(11) The University of California is requested to include information on the average undergraduate student financial self-help level. This information shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and campus of attendance.

(d) To the extent the university provides the information requested in subdivision (c) in reports to its governing board or in other university publications, those reports or publications may be submitted to the Legislature to satisfy this request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 77.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.2.

Consistent with the state’s historic commitment to provide educational opportunity by ensuring both student access to and selection of an institution of higher education for students with financial need, the long-term policy of the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 shall be as follows:

(a) Commencing with the 2001–02 academic year and every year thereafter, an applicant for a Cal Grant A or B award shall receive an award that is not in excess of the financial need amount determined by the Student Aid Commission pursuant to Section 69432.9 if the applicant complies with all of the following requirements:

(1) Demonstrates financial need under the criteria adopted pursuant to Section 69432.9.

(2) Attains a grade point average, as defined in Section 69432.7, meeting the requirements of Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42.

(3) Complies with each of the eligibility criteria applicable to the type of Cal Grant award for which the applicant is applying.

(b) (1) (A) The maximum Cal Grant A award for a student attending the University of California or the California State University shall equal the mandatory systemwide fees in the segment attended by the student, plus the access award specified in Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 69465, or the access award specified in Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470.

(B) The maximum Cal Grant B award for a student who is attending the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges when not enrolled in upper division coursework as described in paragraph (2), shall equal the mandatory systemwide fees in the segment attended by the student, except for community college students who receive waivers from the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, plus the access award calculated as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) or, if the student meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, Article 9 (commencing with Section
 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42, or if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470, Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42, except that in the first year of enrollment in a qualifying institution, the maximum award shall be only for the amount of the access award.

(2) (A) The maximum Cal Grant A award for a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a baccalaureate degree program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, shall equal the per unit fees charged for the upper division coursework for the academic term, plus the access award specified in Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student
 meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, or the access award specified in Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470.

(B) The maximum Cal Grant B award for a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a baccalaureate degree program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, shall equal the per unit fees charged for the upper division coursework for the academic term, plus the access award calculated as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) or, if the student meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 69465, Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42, or if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470, Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42.

(c) The maximum Cal Grant awards for students attending nonpublic institutions shall be as follows:

(1) The maximum Cal Grant A award shall equal the tuition award level established in the Budget Act of 2000, or the amount as adjusted in subsequent annual budget acts.

(2) The maximum Cal Grant B award shall equal the amount of the tuition award as established in the
 Budget Act of 2000, or the amount as adjusted in subsequent annual budget acts, plus the amount of the access costs specified in Section 69435, except that, in the first year of enrollment in a qualifying institution, the maximum award shall be only for the amount of the access award.

(d) Commencing with the 2000–01 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, the Cal Grant C award shall be used only for occupational or technical training.
